Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 11

West Tennessee River Basin Authority

64-1-1101. Creation — Purpose.

There is created and established within the department of environment and conservation, the West Tennessee River basin authority, referred to as the “authority” in this part.

The authority is created to preserve the natural flow and function of the Hatchie, Loosahatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins through environmentally sensitive stream maintenance. The authority shall also seek to:

Maintain or stabilize the function of altered streams and rivers for which the expectation of altered drainage is well established because of agricultural or other land uses and for which the restoration of natural stream or river function is not practicable;

Restore, where practicable, in a self-sustaining manner, natural stream and floodplain dynamics and associated environmental and economic benefits; i.e., restore and conserve fisheries and wildlife habitat, wetlands, water quality and naturally or economically productive bottom land hardwood systems;

Facilitate the proper interaction of private activities adjacent to or affecting public waters that may be negatively affecting those waters; and

In general, provide regional and local leadership for the conservation and sustainable utilization of these river basins and the creek and river basins that flow through the counties of Benton, Decatur and Hardin into the Tennessee River.

These activities shall be accomplished in the twenty-county area of West Tennessee comprised of Lauderdale, Lake, Dyer, Obion, Madison, Weakley, Henry, Gibson, Carroll, Benton, Decatur, Hardin, Haywood, Crockett, Henderson, Chester, McNairy, Tipton, Fayette and Hardeman counties.

The authority shall be administered in such a way as to maximize the funds spent on actual work on the rivers and minimize administrative costs.

As an agency of the state, attached to the department, the authority shall be subject to all laws and regulations applicable to any state department.

The authority shall not exercise any broad governmental controls or police powers to regulate land use planning, zoning, subdivision regulations, building codes, or similar powers to regulate land use.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 2; 2003, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 569, § 1; 2020, ch. 667, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, concerning the Obion-Forked Deer River basin authority was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 1 and this part enacted in its place, except for §§64-1-403 and64-1-404, which were transferred to §§64-1-1103 and64-1-1104, respectively, and amended by that act.

The West Tennessee River basin authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

Acts 2003, ch. 199, § 5, provided that no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act, which amended subsection (b), unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 667, § 5. April 2, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Responsibility for maintenance of Reelfoot Running Bayou, OAG 04-014, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (2/05/04).

64-1-1102. Board of directors.

The West Tennessee River basin authority, under the administrative control of the department of environment and conservation, shall be governed and directed by a board of directors consisting of the following members:

The county mayor of each county electing to participate in the authority shall be a member of the board or, if the county mayor recommends, the county legislative body may select a member of the county legislative body or another citizen of the county to serve instead of the county mayor;

The commissioner of agriculture or a designee;

One (1) member who is a supervisor of a soil conservation district in the participating counties, as established under the Soil Conservation Districts Law, compiled in title 43, chapter 14, part 2, to be appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by interested soil conservation groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Association of Soil Conservation Districts. The term of this member shall coincide with the supervisor's term of office;

Two (2) members of the house of representatives representing part of the area to which this part applies, to serve on the board during that representative's term of office, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from different political parties unless all members representing part of the area only belong to one (1) political party then the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two (2) members from that political party;

Two (2) members of the senate representing part of the area to which this part applies, to serve on the board during that senator's term of office, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate from different political parties unless all members representing part of the area only belong to one (1) political party then the speaker of the senate shall appoint two (2) members from that political party;

The commissioner of environment and conservation or a designee;

The executive director of the wildlife resources agency or a designee;

One (1) member who is a resident of a participating county appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by interested forestry groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Forestry Association;

One (1) member who is a resident of a participating county appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by interested conservation groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Wildlife Federation; and

One (1) member who is a resident of a participating county appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by interested farm business groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Farm Bureau.

The governor shall consult with the interested groups described in subdivision (a)(1) to determine qualified persons to fill the positions on the board.

Annually, at its first meeting of the year, the board shall elect a chair, vice chair and a secretary-treasurer and shall set a regular time and place for meetings of the board.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation except reimbursement as provided by state travel regulations for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

The terms of the members of the board that are appointed by the governor pursuant to subsection (a) shall be six (6) years. Such members shall serve until a successor is appointed.

A member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of the member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (e)(1).

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 199, § 4; 2007, ch. 569, § 2; 2014, ch. 580, § 3; 2016, ch. 699, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 667, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

The former first sentence of subsection (b) and former subsection (d), concerning positions by members of the board of the Obion-Forked Deer River basin authority, were deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2010.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2003, ch. 199, § 5, provided that no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act, which added subsection (e) [now subsection (d)], unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 667, § 5. April 2, 2020.

64-1-1103. Powers and duties.

The powers, duties and functions of the board are as follows:

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with state, federal and local governments, with agencies of such governments, with private individuals and corporations and with associations and organizations as the board may deem necessary or convenient to enable it to carry out the purposes of this part. This authority includes, without limitation, the power to contract and make cooperative arrangements with the adjoining state of Kentucky, including cities, counties and other public agencies within the state, for planning, land purchase and acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of all works related to water resources development, conservation and open space. It is the intent of this subdivision (1) that the authority have full powers to operate across state lines subject only to contractual agreements with private, governmental and public bodies and agencies;

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

Appoint and define duties and compensation of a program manager and other such agents as the board deems necessary to transact its business;

Accept grants, funds and other assistance from any and all governmental agencies, private agencies and individuals and to spend these in behalf of the authority programs;

Set policy for the authority, including identifying projects, the priority of work and allocating how the budget will be spent;

Delegate any of its powers and duties to the staff assigned to it within the department;

Investigate all water and related resources of the Hatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins with regard to flow, hindrances to flow and health of bottomland hardwoods;

Conduct planning for maintenance and restoration of flow and floodplain dynamics of the Hatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins. Such planning shall include the order in which specific projects will be commenced. It may also include the prevention of upland soil erosion through such projects as gully and road bank treatment, cropland conversion and accelerated conservation and treatment of grasslands and forests. Such plan formulation must take into account the plans and proposals already prepared by local, state and federal agencies dealing with water control, conservation and related land development;

Prepare preliminary architectural and engineering plans for specific works;

Execute contracts with existing agencies involved in regional planning and development for providing combined staffs and operating personnel, including the United States corps of engineers, United States soil conservation service and development districts organized under the Development District Act of 1965, compiled in title 13, chapter 14;

Prepare detailed architectural and engineering plans and specifications for specific projects and works related to water resources or flood plains, if needed and appropriate; however, many of the projects should be accomplished without detailed engineering plans and specifications as they will involve only the removal of minor blockages, beaver dams or similar actions;

Arrange with any city, county, state or supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation or other adjustment of roads, highways and utility lines, but the authority is not responsible for the maintenance, construction or removal of roads, highways, bridges or utility lines;

Acquire by purchase or by gift all land and facilities within the area needed for construction of water control structures, channel improvements and facilities for navigation, drainage, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, fish and wildlife and open space. Interest in land may be acquired, including leasehold interest, and the authority may hold, mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease or sublease such land. During the time that title to such property is held in public ownership, it is exempt from all taxes levied by the state and all political subdivisions thereof, and all other property and activities of the authority are similarly exempt;

The power of eminent domain in behalf of authority purposes shall, within their discretion, be exercised by cities and counties within the area. The governing bodies of cities and counties are hereby authorized through the power of eminent domain to acquire all lands and facilities within the area needed for construction of water control structures, channel improvements and facilities for navigation, drainage, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, fish and wildlife and open space. Interest in land may be acquired, including leasehold interest, and such may be held, mortgaged or otherwise encumbered, sold, leased or subleased in behalf of authority purposes. The power of eminent domain may be exercised by the governing bodies of the cities and counties within the area under title 29, chapter 17, and shall include the power to condemn water rights, easements and any other interest in real estate. During the time that title to such property is held in public ownership, it is exempt from all taxes levied by the state and all political subdivisions thereof;

Build, construct, operate, manage, lease and maintain all works, facilities and programs needed for water controls, channel improvements, navigation, drainage, irrigation, water conservation, water quality, water supply, recreation, fish and wildlife and open space;

Obtain funds from county governments for purposes of planning, acquisition of land and facilities, and construction, operation, management and maintenance of all works, facilities and programs particularly required by such county or counties. County governments are empowered, but are not required, to impose taxes to accomplish these programs. Such taxes, if imposed, shall be upon all real property lying within the Obion-Forked Deer Rivers basin area watersheds as situated in the respective counties and drained by the Obion-Forked Deer Rivers and their tributaries, and such tax shall be imposed on that property determined by the county as benefiting from the works of improvement and programs of the authority;

Fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of or in connection with any works or programs that are administered by the authority and in the event any agreements with holders of bonds shall be made as provided in this part, to fix, levy and collect such fees, rents, tolls and other charges in accordance with such agreements and subject thereto; and

All moneys raised by the imposition of ad valorem taxes or by county appropriations shall be deposited with the state treasurer for the operation of the authority; and interest on such funds held for capital outlay shall accrue to the benefit of the authority and shall be carried forward when necessary as with other capital outlay funds. All funds deposited with the state treasurer shall be reported as expendable receipts; however, in the event that any funds raised by ad valorem taxes or by county appropriations remain in an account with the state treasurer for the authority as of June 30 of any fiscal year, it is the intent that such remaining funds shall not revert to the state treasurer, but shall be carried forward for subsequent use in the operations of the authority. The commissioner of finance and administration shall prescribe an equitable procedure for determining the amounts of any remaining funds, such procedure to be approved by the comptroller of the treasury and the board of directors of the Obion-Forked Deer basin authority.

Acts 1976, ch. 448, § 3; 1980, ch. 588, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 604, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A., §64-1-403; Acts 1996, ch. 890, §§ 11-20.

64-1-1104. Financing.

The counties are hereby authorized to levy a tax or by general appropriation to raise funds to provide for the operation of the authority, including, but not limited to, costs of administration, engineering, program development, land acquisition, capital costs and bond financing and amortization. For that purpose, participating counties are hereby authorized to levy on property within the area an ad valorem tax not to exceed three cents (3¢) per each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation for the purpose of funding such project.

It is the duty of the trustee or collector of property tax revenues of each participating county to collect such funds due on an annual basis resulting from such tax and deposit the same in an account of the authority. The funds shall be available for expenditures by the authority for the purposes provided for by this part.

It is the duty of the assessor of property of each participating county to determine the properties that lie within the Hatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins for purposes of taxation, such determination of property and ownership to be a matter of public record, from which the trustee or collector shall perform such person's duty as outlined in this section.

All of the procedures and penalties as apply to local property taxation by counties and municipalities in Tennessee, except as otherwise stated in this part, apply, including the collection and use of funds as described in this section. The tax levy on properties as provided in this section shall become operative and effective immediately upon the first annual assessment date for the counties after the adoption of the resolution of the county governing body levying such tax as now provided for by general statutes of Tennessee.

The state is hereby authorized to issue bonds, if required, in and above direct financing, for the cost of operations of the authority, including, but not limited to, costs of administration, engineering, program development, land acquisition and capital costs and to enter into agreements with counties to participate in bond financing to complete the program and project in its entirety as projected and planned for the Hatchie, Obion, and Forked Deer River basins by the authority. Any bond issue for the cost of operations, wherein the general obligation of the state is attached must first be approved by the general assembly and provision made for amortization of both principal and interest for a period not to exceed forty (40) years.

Each municipality within the area is hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the work of the authority any amount or amounts that its respective governing bodies, acting in its sole discretion, shall approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective municipality. Municipalities are empowered to levy and collect ad valorem taxes for such purposes, which are hereby declared to be for municipal public purposes, not to exceed three cents (3¢) per each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the property taxed.

Acts 1976, ch. 448, § 4; 1980, ch. 604, § 5; T.C.A., §64-1-404; Acts 1996, ch. 890, §§ 21-24.

64-1-1105. Annual reports.

The board of directors of the authority shall report annually as of June 30 of each fiscal year to the governing bodies of the various counties, cities and towns in the area that have contributed financially to the operation of the authority. Such reports shall include statements of financial receipts and expenditures, and a summary of activities and accomplishments for the period and proposed plans for the next fiscal year and for subsequent years.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 4.

64-1-1106. Preexisting and independent projects.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as interfering with existing contracts or works of improvements currently under way by state and local governments or with works of improvements that are undertaken independently of the authority and the state.

The authority shall be the state agency that is responsible for carrying out the state's obligations under any easements given by landowners to the Obion-Forked Deer basin authority as required by the West Tennessee tributaries project of the United States army corps of engineers.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 5.

64-1-1107. Cooperation with county soil conservation districts.

The authority shall develop its program and plans for implementation in close cooperation with existing county soil conservation districts as established under the Soil Conservation Districts Law, compiled in title 43, chapter 14, part 2, and it is the intent of this part that such districts be joint sponsors of individual projects or works of improvements as related to small watersheds in individual counties.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 6.

64-1-1108. Cooperation from state agencies.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized and directed to extend their cooperation and lend assistance to the authority in the formulation and implementation of its program.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 7.

64-1-1109. Election to participate.

This part applies only to the counties of Lauderdale, Lake, Dyer, Obion, Madison, Weakley, Henry, Gibson, Carroll, Benton, Decatur, Hardin, Haywood, Crockett, Henderson, Chester, Tipton, Hardeman, Fayette and McNairy, which may, upon approval by a majority vote of the respective county legislative bodies, elect to participate in such programs as set out in this part; and, in the event such an election is made, this part applies to all counties making such an election.

If any of such counties have previously elected to participate in, and have not withdrawn from, the programs of the Obion-Forked Deer Basin authority established by Acts 1972, ch. 806 or by Acts 1976, ch. 448, as amended, no further election shall be necessary to become a participating county in the authority created by this part; and such status as a participating county shall carry over and apply to the authority and its programs provided for in this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 8; 2003, ch. 199, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 199, § 5, provided that no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act, which amended subsection (a), unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

64-1-1110. Budgetary limitations.

It is the legislative intent, hereby declared, that the purposes of this part shall be carried out subject to the availability of funds with which to do so and that this part shall not be implemented beyond budgetary limitations.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 9.

64-1-1111. Relation to existing laws — Construction of part.

This part shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth in this part.

This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose.

Acts 1996, ch. 890, § 10.